Tennessee statutes. Title 5 Counties
Chapter 3

Consolidation of Counties

5-3-101. State consolidation committee.

There is created a state consolidation committee composed of the following members:

The governor;

The attorney general and reporter or the attorney general and reporter's representative;

The commissioner of revenue or the commissioner's representative;

The commissioner of transportation or the commissioner's representative;

The commissioner of education or the commissioner's representative;

The commissioner of environment and conservation or the commissioner's representative; and

The director and secretary of the state planning office [abolished].

The governor shall serve as chair of the committee and the committee shall meet subject to the call of the governor.

All members shall be notified, in advance, of the time and place of each meeting, and four (4) members shall constitute a quorum.

Acts 1939, ch. 224, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 136.1 (Williams, § 136.2); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 542, § 15; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-301.

Compiler's Notes. The state planning office, referred to in this section, was abolished by Acts 1995, ch. 501, effective June 12, 1995.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 6.

Law Reviews.

City-County Separation and Consolidation, 16 Tenn. L. Rev. 217 (1940).

Attorney General Opinions. Process and effect of altering boundaries between existing counties, OAG 98-035, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 35 (2/9/98).

5-3-102. County consolidation committee.

Upon receipt of a petition, signed by qualified voters of any one (1) county, equal in number to at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the number of votes cast in the county for governor in the last general election, requesting the consolidation of the county or parts of the county with one (1) or more adjoining counties, the state consolidation committee shall appoint a county consolidation committee for the county.

The county consolidation committee shall be composed of the county mayor and the county trustee of the petitioning county, the county mayors of the adjoining counties, and five (5) signers of the petition designated by the governor.

Acts 1939, ch. 224, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 136.2 (Williams, § 136.3); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-302; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 6.

5-3-103. Joint committee — Hearings and report.

The state consolidation committee and the county consolidation committee shall act as a joint committee to consider the request for consolidation and shall hold hearings thereon within the petitioning county.

The hearings shall be public and representatives of the governing bodies of the counties concerned in the proposed consolidation shall be invited to attend.

Within ninety (90) days of the receipt of the petition by the state consolidation committee, the joint committee shall report its findings and recommendations on the feasibility of consolidation of the petitioning county with another county or counties.

If such consolidation should be found desirable, the report shall recommend, among other things, the county or counties with which the petitioning county should be consolidated, and shall set the boundaries thereof.

The findings of the report shall be published in a newspaper or newspapers or a periodical of general distribution within the counties so affected.

Acts 1939, ch. 224, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 136.2 (Williams, § 136.3); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-303.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 6.

5-3-104. Referendum.

If the report of the joint committee recommends that the petitioning county be consolidated, the county election commission of the petitioning county shall, after publication of the report, call an election in the county on the question of whether a constitutional majority of the qualified voters in the county are in favor of the plan of consolidation as recommended by the joint committee.

All registered voters in the county may vote in the election.

After completion of its duties under § 2-8-105(3), the county election commission shall determine and certify the result of the election.

One (1) copy of the certificate shall be delivered by the county election commission to the county clerk of each of the counties affected, one (1) copy shall be delivered to the state consolidation committee, one (1) copy shall be delivered to the county consolidation committee, and one (1) copy shall be delivered to the secretary of state.

Any irregularity in the certificate or any failure or omission to deliver, to forward, to file, or to record the certificate, as provided in subdivision (c)(2), shall not affect the validity of the act, or the legality of the consolidation of the petitioning county with any other county or counties; provided, that it be a fact that a constitutional majority of the qualified voters of the petitioning county voted for the consolidation of the county at the election.

Acts 1939, ch. 224, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 136.3 (Williams, § 136.4); Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 4(2); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-304.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 6.

5-3-105. Dissolution of county — Effective date.

If the result of the election shall show that a constitutional majority of the votes cast, namely two thirds (2/3) or more of the qualified voters in the petitioning county, were in favor of the plan for consolidation, it is declared that the petitioning county shall be, and it shall stand, abolished and dissolved as such, and its territory shall be transferred to, and shall become a part of, the county or counties as set forth in the consolidation plan and any act or acts relating to the creation of the petitioning county shall be and become repealed.

The effective date of the abolishment of any such county and its offices shall be on the quadrennial date, computed from September 1, 1942, following next after completion of proceedings under this chapter.

Acts 1939, ch. 224, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 136.4 (Williams, § 136.5); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-305.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties to include total registered voters, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 6.

5-3-106. Dissolution of county — Transfer of functions, etc.

Immediately upon the effective date of the consolidation of the petitioning county, all county offices of the county shall be and stand abolished, and it shall be the duty of the several county officers in the county to surrender their offices, books, records, funds and other property, and account to the like officers in the county or counties as set forth in the plan for consolidation; and the receiving officers shall be and become entitled to the offices, books, records, funds and property; and the trustee or county clerk, as the case may be, of the absorbing county or counties, shall collect and disburse, as provided by law, all unpaid taxes, fines, licenses and fees for that portion of the county being consolidated with the absorbing county.

Acts 1939, ch. 224, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 136.5 (Williams, § 136.6); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-306.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 6.

5-3-107. Dissolution of county — Rights and duties of county officers.

In the event of a favorable vote under § 5-3-104, the constitutional and other elective officers of the petitioning county, as provided by law, shall continue to serve out their existing terms of office and shall receive full compensation therefor; provided, that such compensation shall not be on a higher rate than was set for the office one (1) year before the receipt of the petition for consolidation by the state consolidation committee; and provided further, that all such offices and compensation shall be and stand abolished upon the effective date of consolidation.

It shall be the duty of such officers to assist the like officers of the absorbing county or counties in effecting the necessary transfer of offices, books, records, funds and other property.

Acts 1939, ch. 224, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 136.6 (Williams, § 136.7); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-307.

Cross-References. Effective date of consolidation, § 5-3-105.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 6.

5-3-108. Districts.

All magisterial or civil districts shall become a part of the absorbing county or counties, as set forth in the consolidation plan.

In the event the combined number of magisterial or civil districts in any absorbing county exceeds the constitutional limitation, namely twenty-five (25), the county legislative body of the county shall, in accordance with §§ 5-1-111 and 5-1-112, at its first regular meeting following the consolidation, redistrict the county to provide not more than the constitutional number of magisterial or civil districts.

In the event the county fails so to act, the state consolidation committee is empowered, authorized and directed so to redistrict the county.

Acts 1939, ch. 224, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 136.6 (Williams, § 136.7); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-308.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 6.

5-3-109. Indebtedness and property.

In the event of a favorable vote under § 5-3-104, the indebtedness of the petitioning county shall be and become the obligation of and against the absorbing county or counties, subject to limitations as set forth in any legislation hereinafter enacted and as set forth in the consolidation plan; and in a like manner the title to all the property, real, personal or mixed, or of whatever character, that belongs to the petitioning county, shall pass to and be and become the property of the absorbing county or counties.

Acts 1939, ch. 224, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 136.7 (Williams, § 136.8); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-309.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 6.

5-3-110. Transfer of court records.

The records, papers, files, etc., in the chancery court, circuit court and court of general sessions of the petitioning county shall be, by the respective clerks of such courts, turned over to the clerks of the respective courts of the absorbing county or counties, as set forth in the consolidation plan.

Acts 1939, ch. 224, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 136.7 (Williams, § 136.8); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-310.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 6.

5-3-111. Voting — Reapportionment.

From and after the effective date of consolidation, the qualified voters of the petitioning county or any portion thereof shall vote in any general or special election with the voters of the county absorbing the petitioning county or portion thereof.

The general assembly, following the effective date of consolidation, shall so apportion the members to the general assembly and shall make such adjustments in the judicial districts as may be found necessary.

Acts 1939, ch. 224, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 136.8 (Williams, § 136.9); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-311.

Cross-References. County legislative body reapportionment, § 5-1-111.

Effective date of consolidation, § 5-3-105.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 6.

5-3-112. [Obsolete.]

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 5-3-112 (Acts 1939, ch. 224, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 136.9 (Williams, § 136.10); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-312), concerning remission of property taxes, is deemed obsolete and was deleted by the code commission in 2005.

5-3-113. Debt reorganization — Definition of terms.

As used in §§ 5-3-113 — 5-3-121, the following words and terms have the following meanings:

“Absorbed county” means any county or a part of any county that is absorbed by another county;

“Absorbing county” means any county that absorbs any other county or portion of any county;

“Funding bonds” means bonds issued to pay or to extend the time of payment of debts not evidenced by bonds;

“Governing body” means the county legislative body of the “absorbing county”; and

“Refunding bonds” means bonds issued to pay or to extend the time of payment of debts evidenced by bonds.

Acts 1939, ch. 225, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 136.10 (Williams, § 136.12); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-313.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 6.

5-3-114. Debt reorganization — Plan.

The governing body is authorized and empowered to prepare a plan of debt reorganization, which may include the bonded or floating indebtedness of the absorbing county, together with any bonded or floating indebtedness of any absorbed county, within ninety (90) days after a consolidation shall have taken place between counties or portions of counties.

The plan of debt reorganization shall be subject to the review of the state consolidation committee, which must approve the plan of debt reorganization in writing before the governing body of the absorbing county undertakes any funding or refunding. To this end, the state consolidation committee shall have the power and authority to demand the production of any and all county books and records, and to require the counties to submit such proofs and information as, in the judgment of the state consolidation committee, may be necessary or helpful.

Any plan of debt reorganization so prepared may provide for the issuance at one (1) time, or from time to time, of bonds of the absorbing or absorbed county for the following purposes:

Funding any or all warrants, notes or other indebtedness of such unit not evidenced by bonds, and interest accrued on the warrants, notes or other indebtedness, that are outstanding at the close of the fiscal year immediately preceding the authorization of such funding bonds;

Refunding any or all bonds of the absorbing and absorbed counties, and interest accrued thereon, whether such units issued such bonds or assumed or became liable therefor, including bonds not matured, if the unmatured bonds be then redeemable, or if the holder thereof be willing to surrender the same for retirement, and including bonds belonging to the sinking funds of such units; and

To pay any redemption premium upon bonds so refunded and also such expenses as the governing body may deem reasonable and proper for carrying out §§ 5-3-113 — 5-3-121.

Acts 1939, ch. 225, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 136.11 (Williams, § 136.13); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-314.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 6.

5-3-115. Debt reorganization — Laws relating to particular county.

All bonds issued under §§ 5-3-113 — 5-3-121 shall be issued according to any other public or private act relating to the absorbing county; provided, that those acts are not in conflict with §§ 5-3-113 — 5-3-121.

Acts 1939, ch. 225, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 136.12 (Williams, § 136.14); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-315.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 6.

5-3-116. Debt reorganization — Bond interest and maturity.

According to the debt reorganization plan, approved by the state consolidation committee, the governing body shall by resolution determine the rate or rates of interest to be paid on the bonds, not exceeding six percent (6%) per annum, and the time or times of payment of such interest, and the maturity or maturities of the bonds, which shall be at a time or times not exceeding twenty (20) years from the date of the bonds, in the case of funding bonds, and not exceeding thirty (30) years from the date of the bonds, in the case of refunding bonds; provided, that with the approval of the state consolidation committee, funding bonds may be made to mature at any time or times not exceeding thirty (30) years from the date of the bonds, and refunding bonds may be made to mature at any time or times not exceeding forty (40) years from the date of the bonds.

Acts 1939, ch. 225, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 136.13 (Williams, § 136.15); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-316.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 6.

5-3-117. Debt reorganization — Bond format and additional terms.

The governing body shall also by resolution determine the form of the bonds, the officers by whom they shall be executed and the place or places in Tennessee or in any other state at which the principal and interest shall be payable. In case any of the officers whose signatures or facsimile signatures appear on the bonds or coupons shall cease to be such officers before the delivery of such bonds, such signatures or facsimile signatures shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if they had remained in office until such delivery.

The bonds may be made registrable as to principal alone, or as to both principal and interest, under such terms and conditions as may be determined by the governing body, and provisions may be made for the exchange of fully registered bonds for coupon bonds and of coupon bonds for fully registered bonds.

Acts 1939, ch. 225, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 136.13 (Williams, § 136.15); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-317.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 6.

5-3-118. Debt reorganization — Terms of bond sale or exchange.

The governing body may sell any or all of the bonds authorized under §§ 5-3-113 — 5-3-121 in such manner and for such price as it may determine to be for the best interests of the unit, but no such sale shall be made at a price so low as to require the payment of interest on the money received therefor at more than six percent (6%) per annum, computed with relation to the absolute maturity or the average maturity of the bonds, in accordance with standard tables of bond values.

Any or all of the bonds authorized under §§ 5-3-113 — 5-3-121 may be exchanged for the bonds to be refunded thereby, or the evidences of indebtedness to be funded thereby, including bonds not matured or redeemable, if the holders thereof be willing to surrender the same for retirement.

Acts 1939, ch. 225, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 136.14 (Williams, § 136.16); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-318.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 6.

5-3-119. Debt reorganization — Bond retirement — Sinking fund.

All bonds issued under §§ 5-3-113 — 5-3-121 shall be direct and general obligations of the unit issuing the same, for the payment of which the full faith and credit of the unit shall be irrevocably pledged.

In each fiscal year while any funding or refunding bonds issued under §§ 5-3-113 — 5-3-121, shall be outstanding, there shall be levied upon all taxable property in the unit an ad valorem tax sufficient to pay the interest on the bonds as it falls due and the principal of such bonds that shall then have matured or that shall mature within the same fiscal year, and any sinking fund payments that may be provided for by the bonds or by the resolution authorizing the same, as well as all deficits in such interest, principal and sinking fund payments arising by failure to comply with §§ 5-3-113 — 5-3-121 or by failure to collect the taxes levied or otherwise; provided, that the governing body, in its discretion, may levy in any fiscal year a tax sufficient to pay, in addition to the interest and principal that shall fall due in such fiscal year, any portion of the interest or principal that shall fall due in any succeeding fiscal year, and may also levy in any fiscal year a tax for sinking fund payments, in addition to the tax required for such payments by the resolution authorizing any of such bonds.

The governing body may provide in the resolution authorizing the issuance of any such funding or refunding bonds, that any sinking fund provided for such bonds shall be used solely for the purchase or redemption of the bonds authorized by such resolution, and all bonds so purchased or redeemed shall be cancelled and shall not be reissued.

Acts 1939, ch. 225, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 136.15 (Williams, § 136.17); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-319.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 6.

5-3-120. Debt reorganization — Bonds tax exempt.

No bonds issued under the authority of §§ 5-3-113 — 5-3-121 shall be subject to taxation by this state or by any county or municipality thereof, and such bonds shall so state on the face thereof.

Acts 1939, ch. 225, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 136.16 (Williams, § 136.18); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-320.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 6.

5-3-121. Debt reorganization — Payment of unfunded debt.

Any floating indebtedness or bonded indebtedness of an absorbed county, not funded or refunded under §§ 5-3-113 — 5-3-121, shall be paid out of a tax levied against the property of the absorbed county.

This tax levy shall be such proportion of the tax levy, levied by the absorbed county for bonds and interest during the past fiscal year, as the outstanding bonds of the absorbed county bears to the outstanding bonds of the absorbed county prior to consolidation.

Acts 1939, ch. 225, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 136.17 (Williams, § 136.19); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-321.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 6.

5-3-122. State consolidation grants — Funding.

The state funding board is authorized to issue at one (1) time or from time to time bonds of the state in an amount not to exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000).

These bonds shall be issued under the authority of title 9, chapter 9, according to the conditions and limitations set forth in former § 9-9-208 [repealed].

All bonds issued under the authority of §§ 5-3-122 — 5-3-125 shall be issued by the state funding board upon request of the state consolidation committee.

These bonds, after issuance, shall constitute general obligations of the state for the payment of which its full faith and credit are hereby pledged and shall be further secured by the pledges of special revenue as provided for in title 9, chapter 9.

Any and all bonds that may be sold by the state funding board pursuant to §§ 5-3-122 — 5-3-125 shall be sold in the same manner and subject to the same conditions as prescribed by former § 9-9-208 [repealed].

Acts 1939, ch. 226, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 136.18 (Williams, § 136.21); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-322.

Compiler's Notes. Section 9-9-208, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1998, ch. 582, § 5, effective March 3, 1998.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 6.

5-3-123. State consolidation grants — Issuance.

The proceeds derived from the sale of bonds issued under the authority of §§ 5-3-122 — 5-3-125 shall be deposited in a special fund to be used by the state consolidation committee for use as described in subsection (b).

Within sixty (60) days after an entire county has consolidated with any other county, according to law, the state consolidation committee shall make a grant out of the proceeds of state bonds as described in subsection (a), to both the absorbed county and the absorbing county.

This grant shall be made, not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) each, both to the absorbing county and absorbed county.

In the event that a portion of any county is absorbed by another county, the state consolidation committee shall make a grant, which shall be computed as follows: The amount of money to be granted for the portion of the absorbed county shall be that proportion of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) that the amount of the assessed valuation being absorbed bears to the total taxable valuation of the whole county, a portion of which is being absorbed.

In the event that only a portion of a county is absorbed by another county, the state consolidation committee shall grant as much money to the absorbing county as is granted to the absorbed county.

Acts 1939, ch. 226, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 136.19 (Williams, § 136.22); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-323.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 6.

5-3-124. State consolidation grants — Use and purpose.

Any money granted by the state consolidation committee to any county or counties shall be used by the counties in the payment of the outstanding indebtedness of the county receiving the grant, and this grant shall have as its purpose the equalization of the burden of bonded indebtedness between the counties being absorbed and absorbing.

Acts 1939, ch. 226, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 136.20 (Williams, § 136.23); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-324.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 6.

5-3-125. State consolidation grants — Reimbursement.

All state moneys now being distributed to both the absorbed and absorbing county or counties shall continue to be distributed to the absorbing county or counties after consolidation on a pro rata basis according to the plan of consolidation approved by the state consolidation committee, and it shall be the duty of the committee to see that sufficient moneys are retained monthly by the state out from the proceeds of the gas tax being distributed to the counties receiving any grants as described in this chapter, so as to permit the state to be reimbursed the principal amount of the grant made to the counties over a period of twenty (20) years.

All money withheld by the state consolidation committee, from the proceeds of the gas tax being distributed to the counties, shall be deposited with the state funding board to be used for the payment of principal and interest on the state's bonded indebtedness.

Acts 1939, ch. 226, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 136.21 (Williams, § 136.24); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-325.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 6.